District of Columbia statutes.
4-636

Prohibitions.

It shall be unlawful for a health insurer to eliminate or restrict the availability of a health insurance plan offered in the District with the intent of shifting beneficiaries to the Program. An entity found to be in violation of this section shall be subject to a fine of not less than $10,000.

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5046, 55 DCR 7598